Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-221
Nuisances; prevention; abatement.

A primary city shall have power, by ordinance, to prevent any person from bringing, having, depositing or leaving upon or near his premises or elsewhere within the city any dead carcass, or other putrid beef, pork, fish, hides or skins of any kind, or any other unwholesome substance, and to compel the removal of the same.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXV, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 4435;

C.S.1922, § 3819;

C.S.1929, § 15-222;

R.S.1943, § 15-221.

Mosquitoes, flies, or other insects, nuisance, abatement, see sections 71-2917 and 71-2918.